Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Applicability

§ 21-1-65.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to and govern the creation, enlargement, contraction, and abolition of all municipalities of this state hereafter, whether such municipality be operating under the code charter, under the commission form of government, under the council form of government, under the council-manager form of government, or under a special charter, and regardless of whether a different or special procedure be provided by any such special charter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-32; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1950.